Utah statutes.
61-1-102.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Adverse action" means to:

(a)  discharge, threaten, or directly or indirectly harass an employee; or

(b)  otherwise discriminate against an employee in any manner that affects the employee's employment, including:

(i)  compensation;

(ii)  terms;

(iii)  conditions;

(iv)  location;

(v)  rights;

(vi)  immunities;

(vii)  promotions; or

(viii)  privileges.

(2)  "Covered judicial or administrative action" means a judicial or administrative action brought under this chapter that results in a monetary sanction exceeding $50,000.

(3)  "Employee" means an individual who performs a service for wages or other remuneration under a contract of hire, written or oral, express or implied.

(4)  "Fund" means the Securities Investor Education, Training, and Enforcement Fund created in Section 61-1-18.7.

(5)  "Original information" means information that is:

(a)  derived from the independent knowledge or analysis of an individual;

(b)  not known to the division or commission from a source other than the individual; and

(c)  unless the individual is the source of the information, not exclusively derived from:

(i)  an allegation made in a judicial or administrative hearing;

(ii)  a government report, hearing, audit, or investigation; or

(iii)  the media.

(6)  "Monetary sanction" means money required to be paid under this chapter as the result of a judicial or administrative action, including a penalty or disgorgement.

(7)  "Reporter" means an individual who provides original information relating to a violation in accordance with Section 61-1-103.



Enacted by Chapter 318, 2011 General Session

